Maine, session 132, LD1485.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3028, sub-§9-A is enacted to read:
9-A. Certain deaths of children under 3 years of age. If a medical examiner has
determined that a child under 3 years of age has died as a result of sudden infant death
syndrome or if the medical examiner is unable to determine the cause of death for a child
under 3 years of age, the Chief Medical Examiner shall, at the request of the child's parent
or legal guardian, preserve and retain sufficient tissue samples and other evidence
necessary to make a subsequent determination of the cause of death for one year following
the date of death of the child. Such evidence must be made accessible to the parent or
guardian of the child.